Rhode Island, session 2025, SB566.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 9-1 of the General Laws entitled "Causes of Action" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
9-1-55. Civil liability of individual or entity that prohibits the possession of firearms.
(a) Whenever any person who owns a firearm, and is authorized and licensed to carry a
firearm, shall suffer any injury to his or her person or death, suffer physical, emotional and/or
mental distress, incur economic loss or expense, property damage or any other compensable loss
as a result of conduct occurring on real property, except residences, with a written notice prohibiting
the possession of firearms, may recover his or her damages for the injury or death, physical,
emotional and/or mental distress, economic loss or expense, property damage or any other
compensable loss, in a civil action against the individual or entity that owns the real property that
prohibits the possession of firearms.
(b) The cause of action set forth in subsection (a) of this section shall extend to the conduct
of other invitees, trespassers, employees of the person or entity, vicious animals, wild animals, and
defensible man-made and natural hazards.
(c) The statute of limitations for the cause of action set forth in subsection (a) of this section
shall be three (3) years from the date of the occurrence of the conduct which gave rise to any
damages.
(d) To prevail in a cause of action brought under this section, the plaintiff must show by a

preponderance of the evidence that:
(1) The plaintiff owned a firearm, was authorized and licensed to carry a firearm or was
not prohibited from carrying a firearm at the time of the incident giving rise to the action;
(2) The plaintiff did not carry the firearm on the property where the incident occurred
because of the written notice prohibiting the possession of firearms;
(3) The injury, death, physical, emotional and/or mental distress, economic loss or expense,
property damage or other compensable loss was caused as a result of the conduct that occurred on
the real property and could have been avoided if the plaintiff was authorized to carry his or her
firearm onto the real property; and
(4) The person or entity exercising control over the real property was not required by state
or federal law to post the notice prohibiting the possession of firearms, but posted the notice by
choice of that individual or entity.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000347
========
LC000347 - Page 2 of 3